apertium-arg.arg.dix
<pardef n="inclu/ir__vblex">

  <e>       <p><l>igo</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yo</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yes</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>is</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ye</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yen</l>       <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pri12pl_imos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pri12pl_imos__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>í</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yi</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yí</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>y</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>y</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yi</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yi</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="futuro_re__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>yi</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="futuro_re__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e>       <p><l>yi</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_ria__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>í</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_ria__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yi</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yí</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>y</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yi</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>y</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_ise__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_ise__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>y</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_erai__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>y</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>y</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/itz__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_viv/itz__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="inf_ir__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="inf_ir__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_indo__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_indo__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yendo</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yendo</l>     <r>ir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_u__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yi</l>        <r>ir<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_u__cnjgt"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="atribuir">        <i>atribu</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="concluir">        <i>conclu</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="constituir">      <i>constitu</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="construir">       <i>constru</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="contribuir">      <i>contribu</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="contribuir"><p><l>contrebu</l> <r>contribu</r></p><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="destruir">        <i>destru</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="disminuir">       <i>disminu</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="distribuir">      <i>distribu</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="incluir">  <p><l>enclu</l>     <r>inclu</r></p><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="esleir" i="yes"><i>esle</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="excluir">         <i>exclu</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="incluir">         <i>inclu</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="influir">         <i>influ</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="instituir">       <i>institu</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="intuir">          <i>intu</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reconstruir">     <i>reconstru</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="redistribuir">    <i>redistribu</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="restituir">       <i>restitu</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="substituyir">     <i>substitu</i><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="substituyir"><p><l>sustitu</l> <r>substitu</r></p><par n="inclu/ir__vblex"/></e>
